Texas statutes.
SPECIAL DISTRICT LOCAL LAWS CODE

TITLE 6. WATER AND WASTEWATER

SUBTITLE F. MUNICIPAL UTILITY DISTRICTS

CHAPTER 8228. WOOD TRACE MUNICIPAL UTILITY DISTRICT NO. 1, OF MONTGOMERY COUNTY, TEXAS

SUBCHAPTER A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 8228.001. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Board" means the district's board of directors.

(2) "Director" means a member of the board.

(3) "District" means the Wood Trace Municipal Utility District No. 1, of Montgomery County, Texas.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 855 (S.B. 1162), Sec. 1.04, eff. April 1, 2017.

Sec. 8228.002. NATURE OF DISTRICT. The district is a conservation and reclamation district in Montgomery County created under Section 59, Article XVI, Texas Constitution.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 855 (S.B. 1162), Sec. 1.04, eff. April 1, 2017.

Sec. 8228.003. FINDINGS OF BENEFIT AND PUBLIC PURPOSE. (a) The district is created to serve a public use and benefit.

(b) All land and other property included in the district will benefit from the works and projects accomplished by the district under the powers conferred by Section 59, Article XVI, Texas Constitution.

(c) The creation of the district is essential to accomplish the purposes of:

(1) a municipal utility district as provided by general law and Section 59, Article XVI, Texas Constitution; and

(2) Section 52, Article III, Texas Constitution, that relate to the construction, acquisition, improvement, operation, or maintenance of macadamized, graveled, or paved roads, or improvements, including storm drainage, in aid of those roads.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 855 (S.B. 1162), Sec. 1.04, eff. April 1, 2017.

Amended by:

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 14 (H.B. 1664), Sec. 1, eff. May 18, 2017.

Sec. 8228.004. DISTRICT TERRITORY. (a) The district is composed of the territory described by Section 3, Chapter 218, Acts of the 72nd Legislature, Regular Session, 1991, as that territory may have been modified under:

(1) Subchapter H, Chapter 54, Water Code;

(2) Subchapter J, Chapter 49, Water Code; or

(3) other law.

(b) The boundaries and field notes of the district form a closure. A mistake in the field notes or in copying the field notes in the legislative process does not affect:

(1) the district's organization, existence, or validity;

(2) the district's right to impose a tax; or

(3) the legality or operation of the district or its governing body.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 855 (S.B. 1162), Sec. 1.04, eff. April 1, 2017.

SUBCHAPTER B. BOARD OF DIRECTORS

Sec. 8228.051. COMPOSITION OF BOARD; TERMS. (a) The district is governed by a board of five directors.

(b) Directors serve staggered four-year terms.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 855 (S.B. 1162), Sec. 1.04, eff. April 1, 2017.

SUBCHAPTER C. POWERS AND DUTIES

Sec. 8228.101. MUNICIPAL UTILITY DISTRICT POWERS AND DUTIES. The district has the rights, powers, privileges, functions, and duties provided by general law, including Chapters 49, 50, and 54, Water Code, applicable to a municipal utility district created under Section 59, Article XVI, Texas Constitution.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 855 (S.B. 1162), Sec. 1.04, eff. April 1, 2017.

Sec. 8228.102. AUTHORITY FOR ROAD PROJECTS. Under Section 52, Article III, Texas Constitution, the district may design, acquire, construct, finance, issue bonds for, improve, operate, maintain, and convey to this state, a county, or a municipality for operation and maintenance macadamized, graveled, or paved roads, or improvements, including storm drainage, in aid of those roads.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 14 (H.B. 1664), Sec. 2, eff. May 18, 2017.

Sec. 8228.103. ROAD STANDARDS AND REQUIREMENTS. (a) A road project must meet all applicable construction standards, zoning and subdivision requirements, and regulations of each municipality in whose corporate limits or extraterritorial jurisdiction the road project is located.

(b) If a road project is not located in the corporate limits or extraterritorial jurisdiction of a municipality, the road project must meet all applicable construction standards, subdivision requirements, and regulations of each county in which the road project is located.

(c) If the state will maintain and operate the road, the Texas Transportation Commission must approve the plans and specifications of the road project.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 14 (H.B. 1664), Sec. 2, eff. May 18, 2017.

SUBCHAPTER D. BONDS

Sec. 8228.151. BONDS FOR ROAD PROJECTS. At the time of issuance, the total principal amount of bonds or other obligations issued or incurred to finance road projects and payable from ad valorem taxes may not exceed one-fourth of the assessed value of the real property in the district.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 14 (H.B. 1664), Sec. 3, eff. May 18, 2017.